Utah statutes.
78A-1-107.   Savings clause -- Recodification of Title 78.
The provisions of Title 78A, Judiciary and Judicial Administration, and Title
78B, Judicial Code, are considered a continuation of the previous Title 78,
Judicial Code.  No loss of rights, interruption of jurisdiction, or prejudice
to matters pending in any court on February 7, 2008 shall result from the
enactment of Titles 78A and 78B.  With respect to the organization of the
courts, the offices of all officers and employees, shall be construed as
continuations of the previous Title 78, Judicial Code.  The tenure of
justices, judges, justices of the peace, officers, and employees of the courts
in office on February 7, 2008 is not affected by its enactment.
